California, session 20252026, SB571.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 451.5 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 706 of the Statutes of 2023, is amended to read:451.5. (a) A person who willfully, maliciously, deliberately, with premeditation, and with intent to cause injury to one or more persons, or to cause damage to property under circumstances likely to produce injury to one or more persons, or to cause damage to one or more structures or inhabited dwellings, sets fire to, burns, or causes to be burned, or aids, counsels, or procures the burning of any residence, structure, forest land, or property, is guilty of aggravated arson if one or more of the following aggravating factors exists:(1) The defendant has been previously convicted of arson on one or more occasions within the past 10 years.(2) (A) The fire caused property damage and other losses in excess of ten million one hundred thousand dollars ($10,100,000), exclusive of damage to, or destruction of, inhabited dwellings.(B) In calculating the total amount of property damage and other losses under subparagraph (A), the court shall consider the cost of fire suppression. It is the intent of the Legislature that this paragraph be reviewed within five years to consider the effects of inflation on the dollar amount stated herein.(3) The fire caused damage to, or the destruction of, five or more inhabited dwellings.(b) A person who is convicted under subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 10 years to life.(c) A person who is sentenced under subdivision (b) shall not be eligible for release on parole until 10 calendar years have elapsed.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that amendments to the threshold dollar amount set forth in this section are to be applied prospectively only and shall not be interpreted to benefit any defendant who committed any crime or received any sentence before the effective date of the threshold. (e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 463.2 is added to the Penal Code, to read:463.2. (a) In sentencing a person convicted of a violation of Section 463, the court may consider the fact, if pled and proven, that the defendant committed the crime while impersonating emergency personnel as a factor in aggravation in sentencing.(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Emergency personnel” means a peace officer, an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, an employee of a public utility or district, state, county, city, or special district, a city and county officer or employee, an officer or member of a governmental agency-managed or -affiliated search and rescue unit or team, an officer or member of the Armed Forces of the United States, the California National Guard, the State Guard, the Naval Militia, the national guard of any other state, or any other reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or an emergency medical technician, as defined in Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.(2) “Impersonating” means willfully wearing, exhibiting, or using of an authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of emergency personnel with the intent of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are emergency personnel.SEC. 3. Section 538i is added to the Penal Code, to read:538i. (a) Any person, other than a first responder, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of a first responder with the intent of fraudulently impersonating a first responder in an area subject to an evacuation order or who willfully and credibly impersonates a first responder on an internet website, or by other electronic means, during an evacuation order or within 30 days of its termination, for purposes of defrauding another, shall be punished by either imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and by a fine not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Evacuation order” has the same meaning as in Section 463.(2) “First responder” means a first responder as defined under Section 8562 of the Government Code, or any employee of the Federal Emergency Management Agency under Section 313 of Subchapter V of Chapter 1 of Title 6 of the United States Code.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 5. This act shall become operative only if Assembly Bill 468 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is enacted and becomes effective on or before January 1, 2026.